Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.250

Failure of consignor to file claim, time limitation.

If a consignor creditor so addressed fails, refuses or neglects to file in the office of the director his or her verified claim as requested by the director within sixty days from the date of such request, the director shall thereupon be relieved of further duty or action hereunder on behalf of said consignor creditor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 580; 1959 c 139 s 25.]